Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.075

Business license application handling and renewal fees—Department review of the business license account balance.

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department must collect a handling fee on each business license application and each renewal application filing. The department must set the amount of the handling fees by rule, as authorized by RCW 19.02.030. The handling fees may not exceed $90 for each business license application filed by any person to open or reopen a business, $10 for each business license renewal application filing, and $19 for each business license application filed for any other purpose. Handling fees collected under this section must be deposited in the business license account created under RCW 19.02.210.

(b) No handling fee is collected on a business license application filed by an existing business for the following purposes:

(i) To open an additional location; or

(ii) To obtain a local government's nonresident business license endorsement.

(2) The department may increase all handling fees within the limits provided in this section for the purposes of defraying the department's costs associated with the administration of this chapter, including making improvements in the business licensing service program, such as improvements in technology and customer services, expanded access, and infrastructure.

(3) Annually, by the last day of September, beginning September 30, 2024, the department must review the business license account balance. If the balance in the account at the end of the previous fiscal year exceeds an amount equal to the average of three months of monthly expenditures from the business license account during the previous fiscal year, or the department projects that the balance in the business license account at the end of the current fiscal year will exceed an amount equal to the average of three months of monthly expenditures from the business license account during the previous fiscal year, the department must reduce one or more of the handling fees authorized in subsection (1) of this section. Handling fees must be reduced under this subsection (3) to the extent the department determines necessary to result in a balance in the business license account at the end of the fiscal year following the current fiscal year, as projected by the department, of no more than an amount equal to the average of three months of monthly expenditures from the business license account during the previous fiscal year. This subsection (3) does not require the department to reduce handling fees more than once in any fiscal year.

(4) In increasing or decreasing any fee under this section, the department may round the adjusted fee to the nearest whole dollar that does not exceed the dollar limits in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2024 c 270 s 1; 2020 c 164 s 1; 2013 c 144 s 20; 2011 c 298 s 8; 1995 c 403 s 1007; 1992 c 107 s 2; 1990 c 264 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 164: "This act takes effect July 1, 2020." [ 2020 c 164 s 2.]

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.

Effective dates—1992 c 107: See note following RCW 19.02.020.

Effective date—1990 c 264: See note following RCW 19.02.070.